Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Article VIII. Entry into Force; Additional
Members and Withdrawal

§ 1820.
Entry into force; additional members.

The compact shall enter into force effective when enacted into law by any three states of the group of states composed of Connecticut, Delaware, Maine, Maryland, Massachusetts, New Hampshire, New Jersey, New York, Pennsylvania, Rhode Island, Vermont, and Virginia, and when the consent of Congress has been obtained. This compact shall also be open to states which are contiguous to any of the named states and open to states which are contiguous to participating states.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 3, 1993.

§ 1821.
Withdrawal from compact.

Any participating state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same, but no such withdrawal shall take effect until one year after notice in writing of the withdrawal is given to the Commission and the governors of all other participating states. No withdrawal shall affect any liability already incurred by or chargeable to a party state prior to the time of such withdrawal.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 3, 1993.

§ 1822.
Severability.

If any part or provision of this compact is adjudged invalid by any court, such judgment shall be confined in its operation to the part or provision directly involved in the controversy in which such judgment shall have been rendered and shall not affect or impair the validity of the remainder of this compact.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 3, 1993.